Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2677.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [16C.0715] REQUIRED TERM IN FEDERAL CONTRACTS. new text end new text begin A contract between the state or a state agency and a federal government entity for the state to administer the dispersion of federal funds must authorize the state to withhold payments to a recipient of the federal money when a state official or employee has a reasonable suspicion that the recipient has secured the payment through an intentional or deceptive act to gain an unlawful benefit. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment and applies to contracts executed on or after that date. new text end